Massachusetts, session 194th, H2762.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
teachers’ retirement board shall credit Kellie Martin, a member of the teachers’ retirement
system and an employee of the Greater New Bedford Regional Vocational Technical High
School in the city of New Bedford, with creditable service for the period of August 28, 2003 to
August 28, 2006, inclusive, for the purpose of determining her superannuation retirement
allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws. Before the date that any retirement allowance becomes effective for Kellie Martin, she
shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the teachers’ retirement system in 1 sum or
installments, upon such terms and conditions as the teachers’ retirement board may prescribe, an
of 2

amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from her regular
compensation for such previous service, plus buyback interest, as defined in section 1 of said
chapter 32.
of 2